da: Tilstand for udsmeltning af fedt: Delvist afsmeltet; Afsmeltet; Uafsmeltet; Andet
vi: Trạng thái chế biến mỡ: Lọc lấy mỡ một phần; Đã thắng; Chưa thắng; Khác
pl: Stan wytopienia tłuszczu: Częściowo wytopiony; Wytopiony; Niewytopiony; Inny
pt-PT: Estado de renderização de gordura: Parcialmente fundida; Fundida; Não fundida; Outro
sl-SI: Stanje topivosti maščobe: Delno topljeno; Topljeno; Netopljeno; Drugo
ru: Состояние вытопки жира: Частично вытопленный; Вытопленный; Невытопленный; Другое
es: Estado de representación de la grasa: Parcialmente fundida; Fundida; Sin fundir; Otro
cs: Stav škvaření tuku: Částečně vyškvařené; Vyškvařené; Nevyškvařené; Jiné
en: Fat rendering state: Partially rendered; Rendered; Unrendered; Other
de: Zustand des ausgelassenen Fetts: Teilweise ausgelassen; Ausgelassen; Nicht ausgelassen; Sonstiges
fr: État de fonte de la graisse: Partiellement fondu; Fondu; Non fondu; Autre
ro-RO: Stare de redare a grăsimilor: Topită parțial; Topită; Netopită; Altele
bg-BG: Състояние на разтопената мазнина: Частично стопено; Стопено; Нестопено; Друго
lt-LT: Riebalų lydymo būsena: Iš dalies lydyti; Lydyti; Nelydyti; Kita
th: สถานะการแปรสภาพของไขมัน: ผ่านการเจียวบางส่วน; ผ่านการเจียว; ยังไม่ผ่านการเจียว; อื่นๆ
hu: Zsír renderelési állapot: Részben kiolvasztott; Kiolvasztott; Kiolvasztatlan; Egyéb
zh-CN: 脂肪炼制状态: 部分提炼; 已提炼; 未提炼; 其他
pt-BR: Estado de derretimento da gordura: Parcialmente derretida; Derretida; Não derretida; Outros
sk-SK: Stav vyškvarenia tuku: Čiastočne vyškvarený; Vyškvarený; Nevyškvarený; Iný
nl: Vet uitsmelting status: Gedeeltelijk uitgesmolten; Uitgesmolten; Niet-uitgesmolten; Overig
it: stato di rendering grasso: Parzialmente fuso; Fuso; Non fuso; Altro
hr-HR: Stanje renderiranja masti: Djelomično topljeno; Topljeno; Netopljeno; Ostalo
ja: 脂肪のレンダリング状態: 一部精製済み; 精製済み; 未精製; その他
tr: Yağın eritme durumu: Kısmen eritilmiş; Eritilmiş; Eritilmemiş; Diğer
ko: 지방 정제 상태: 부분 정제; 정제; 비정제; 기타
fi: Rasvan sulatustila: Osittain sulatettu; Sulatettu; Sulattamaton; Muu
el: Κατάσταση επεξεργασίας λίπους: Μερικώς λιωμένο; Λιωμένο; Άλιωτο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 脂肪煉製狀態: 部分提煉; 已提煉; 未提煉; 其他
nb: Fettgjengivelsestilstand: Delvis utsmeltet; Utsmeltet; Ikke utsmeltet; Annet
sv: Utsmältningsgrad av fett: Delvis utsmält; Utsmält; Ej utsmält; Övrigt